epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/lo.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<hyphenation-info>

	<!-- Lao Hyphenation Patterns -->

	<!-- (more info about the licence to be added later) -->


	<hyphen-min before="1" after="1"/>

	<exceptions>
	</exceptions>

	<patterns>
		ກ4ະ
		ກຣ4ະ
		ກລ4ະ
		ກວ4ະ
		ກຼ4ະ
		ຂ4ະ
		ຂຣ4ະ
		ຂລ4ະ
		ຂວ4ະ
		ຂຼ4ະ
		ຄ4ະ
		ຄຣ4ະ
		ຄລ4ະ
		ຄວ4ະ
		ຄຼ4ະ
		ງ4ະ
		ຈ4ະ
		ຊ4ະ
		ຍ4ະ
		ດ4ະ
		ດຣ4ະ
		ຕ4ະ
		ຕຣ4ະ
		ຖ4ະ
		ທ4ະ
		ນ4ະ
		ບ4ະ
		ບຣ4ະ
		ບລ4ະ
		ບຼ4ະ
		ປ4ະ
		ປຣ4ະ
		ປລ4ະ
		ປຼ4ະ
		ຜ4ະ
		ຝ4ະ
		ຝຣ4ະ
		ຝຼ4ະ
		ພ4ະ
		ຟ4ະ
		ມ4ະ
		ຢ4ະ
		ຣ4ະ
		ລ4ະ
		ວ4ະ
		ສ4ະ
		ສຣ4ະ
		ສລ4ະ
		ສວ4ະ
		ສຼ4ະ
		ຫ4ະ
		ຫງ4ະ
		ຫນ4ະ
		ຫຍ4ະ
		ຫມ4ະ
		ຫຣ4ະ
		ຫລ4ະ
		ຫວ4ະ
		ຫຼ4ະ
		ອ4ະ
		ຮ4ະ
		ໜ4ະ
		ໝ4ະ
		ກ5ກ
		ກ5ກຣ
		ກ5ກລ
		ກ5ກວ
		ກ5ກຼ
		ກ5ຂ
		ກ5ຂຣ
		ກ5ຂລ
		ກ5ຂວ
		ກ5ຂຼ
		ກ5ຄ
		ກ5ຄຣ
		ກ5ຄລ
		ກ5ຄວ
		ກ5ຄຼ
		ກ5ງ
		ກ5ຈ
		ກ5ຊ
		ກ5ຍ
		ກ5ດ
		ກ5ດຣ
		ກ5ຕ
		ກ5ຕຣ
		ກ5ຖ
		ກ5ທ
		ກ5ນ
		ກ5ບ
		ກ5ບຣ
		ກ5ບລ
		ກ5ບຼ
		ກ5ປ
		ກ5ປຣ
		ກ5ປລ
		ກ5ປຼ
		ກ5ຜ
		ກ5ຝ
		ກ5ຝຣ
		ກ5ຝຼ
		ກ5ພ
		ກ5ຟ
		ກ5ມ
		ກ5ຢ
		ກ5ຣ
		ກ5ລ
		ກ5ວ
		ກ5ສ
		ກ5ສຣ
		ກ5ສລ
		ກ5ສວ
		ກ5ສຼ
		ກ5ຫ
		ກ5ຫງ
		ກ5ຫນ
		ກ5ຫຍ
		ກ5ຫມ
		ກ5ຫຣ
		ກ5ຫລ
		ກ5ຫວ
		ກ5ຫຼ
		ກ5ອ
		ກ5ຮ
		ກ5ໜ
		ກ5ໝ
		ງ5ກ
		ງ5ກຣ
		ງ5ກລ
		ງ5ກວ
		ງ5ກຼ
		ງ5ຂ
		ງ5ຂຣ
		ງ5ຂລ
		ງ5ຂວ
		ງ5ຂຼ
		ງ5ຄ
		ງ5ຄຣ
		ງ5ຄລ
		ງ5ຄວ
		ງ5ຄຼ
		ງ5ງ
		ງ5ຈ
		ງ5ຊ
		ງ5ຍ
		ງ5ດ
		ງ5ດຣ
		ງ5ຕ
		ງ5ຕຣ
		ງ5ຖ
		ງ5ທ
		ງ5ນ
		ງ5ບ
		ງ5ບຣ
		ງ5ບລ
		ງ5ບຼ
		ງ5ປ
		ງ5ປຣ
		ງ5ປລ
		ງ5ປຼ
		ງ5ຜ
		ງ5ຝ
		ງ5ຝຣ
		ງ5ຝຼ
		ງ5ພ
		ງ5ຟ
		ງ5ມ
		ງ5ຢ
		ງ5ຣ
		ງ5ລ
		ງ5ວ
		ງ5ສ
		ງ5ສຣ
		ງ5ສລ
		ງ5ສວ
		ງ5ສຼ
		ງ5ຫ
		ງ5ຫງ
		ງ5ຫນ
		ງ5ຫຍ
		ງ5ຫມ
		ງ5ຫຣ
		ງ5ຫລ
		ງ5ຫວ
		ງ5ຫຼ
		ງ5ອ
		ງ5ຮ
		ງ5ໜ
		ງ5ໝ
		ຍ5ກ
		ຍ5ກຣ
		ຍ5ກລ
		ຍ5ກວ
		ຍ5ກຼ
		ຍ5ຂ
		ຍ5ຂຣ
		ຍ5ຂລ
		ຍ5ຂວ
		ຍ5ຂຼ
		ຍ5ຄ
		ຍ5ຄຣ
		ຍ5ຄລ
		ຍ5ຄວ
		ຍ5ຄຼ
		ຍ5ງ
		ຍ5ຈ
		ຍ5ຊ
		ຍ5ຍ
		ຍ5ດ
		ຍ5ດຣ
		ຍ5ຕ
		ຍ5ຕຣ
		ຍ5ຖ
		ຍ5ທ
		ຍ5ນ
		ຍ5ບ
		ຍ5ບຣ
		ຍ5ບລ
		ຍ5ບຼ
		ຍ5ປ
		ຍ5ປຣ
		ຍ5ປລ
		ຍ5ປຼ
		ຍ5ຜ
		ຍ5ຝ
		ຍ5ຝຣ
		ຍ5ຝຼ
		ຍ5ພ
		ຍ5ຟ
		ຍ5ມ
		ຍ5ຢ
		ຍ5ຣ
		ຍ5ລ
		ຍ5ວ
		ຍ5ສ
		ຍ5ສຣ
		ຍ5ສລ
		ຍ5ສວ
		ຍ5ສຼ
		ຍ5ຫ
		ຍ5ຫງ
		ຍ5ຫນ
		ຍ5ຫຍ
		ຍ5ຫມ
		ຍ5ຫຣ
		ຍ5ຫລ
		ຍ5ຫວ
		ຍ5ຫຼ
		ຍ5ອ
		ຍ5ຮ
		ຍ5ໜ
		ຍ5ໝ
		ດ5ກ
		ດ5ກຣ
		ດ5ກລ
		ດ5ກວ
		ດ5ກຼ
		ດ5ຂ
		ດ5ຂຣ
		ດ5ຂລ
		ດ5ຂວ
		ດ5ຂຼ
		ດ5ຄ
		ດ5ຄຣ
		ດ5ຄລ
		ດ5ຄວ
		ດ5ຄຼ
		ດ5ງ
		ດ5ຈ
		ດ5ຊ
		ດ5ຍ
		ດ5ດ
		ດ5ດຣ
		ດ5ຕ
		ດ5ຕຣ
		ດ5ຖ
		ດ5ທ
		ດ5ນ
		ດ5ບ
		ດ5ບຣ
		ດ5ບລ
		ດ5ບຼ
		ດ5ປ
		ດ5ປຣ
		ດ5ປລ
		ດ5ປຼ
		ດ5ຜ
		ດ5ຝ
		ດ5ຝຣ
		ດ5ຝຼ
		ດ5ພ
		ດ5ຟ
		ດ5ມ
		ດ5ຢ
		ດ5ຣ
		ດ5ລ
		ດ5ວ
		ດ5ສ
		ດ5ສຣ
		ດ5ສລ
		ດ5ສວ
		ດ5ສຼ
		ດ5ຫ
		ດ5ຫງ
		ດ5ຫນ
		ດ5ຫຍ
		ດ5ຫມ
		ດ5ຫຣ
		ດ5ຫລ
		ດ5ຫວ
		ດ5ຫຼ
		ດ5ອ
		ດ5ຮ
		ດ5ໜ
		ດ5ໝ
		ມ5ກ
		ມ5ກຣ
		ມ5ກລ
		ມ5ກວ
		ມ5ກຼ
		ມ5ຂ
		ມ5ຂຣ
		ມ5ຂລ
		ມ5ຂວ
		ມ5ຂຼ
		ມ5ຄ
		ມ5ຄຣ
		ມ5ຄລ
		ມ5ຄວ
		ມ5ຄຼ
		ມ5ງ
		ມ5ຈ
		ມ5ຊ
		ມ5ຍ
		ມ5ດ
		ມ5ດຣ
		ມ5ຕ
		ມ5ຕຣ
		ມ5ຖ
		ມ5ທ
		ມ5ນ
		ມ5ບ
		ມ5ບຣ
		ມ5ບລ
		ມ5ບຼ
		ມ5ປ
		ມ5ປຣ
		ມ5ປລ
		ມ5ປຼ
		ມ5ຜ
		ມ5ຝ
		ມ5ຝຣ
		ມ5ຝຼ
		ມ5ພ
		ມ5ຟ
		ມ5ມ
		ມ5ຢ
		ມ5ຣ
		ມ5ລ
		ມ5ວ
		ມ5ສ
		ມ5ສຣ
		ມ5ສລ
		ມ5ສວ
		ມ5ສຼ
		ມ5ຫ
		ມ5ຫງ
		ມ5ຫນ
		ມ5ຫຍ
		ມ5ຫມ
		ມ5ຫຣ
		ມ5ຫລ
		ມ5ຫວ
		ມ5ຫຼ
		ມ5ອ
		ມ5ຮ
		ມ5ໜ
		ມ5ໝ
		ນ5ກ
		ນ5ກຣ
		ນ5ກລ
		ນ5ກວ
		ນ5ກຼ
		ນ5ຂ
		ນ5ຂຣ
		ນ5ຂລ
		ນ5ຂວ
		ນ5ຂຼ
		ນ5ຄ
		ນ5ຄຣ
		ນ5ຄລ
		ນ5ຄວ
		ນ5ຄຼ
		ນ5ງ
		ນ5ຈ
		ນ5ຊ
		ນ5ຍ
		ນ5ດ
		ນ5ດຣ
		ນ5ຕ
		ນ5ຕຣ
		ນ5ຖ
		ນ5ທ
		ນ5ນ
		ນ5ບ
		ນ5ບຣ
		ນ5ບລ
		ນ5ບຼ
		ນ5ປ
		ນ5ປຣ
		ນ5ປລ
		ນ5ປຼ
		ນ5ຜ
		ນ5ຝ
		ນ5ຝຣ
		ນ5ຝຼ
		ນ5ພ
		ນ5ຟ
		ນ5ມ
		ນ5ຢ
		ນ5ຣ
		ນ5ລ
		ນ5ວ
		ນ5ສ
		ນ5ສຣ
		ນ5ສລ
		ນ5ສວ
		ນ5ສຼ
		ນ5ຫ
		ນ5ຫງ
		ນ5ຫນ
		ນ5ຫຍ
		ນ5ຫມ
		ນ5ຫຣ
		ນ5ຫລ
		ນ5ຫວ
		ນ5ຫຼ
		ນ5ອ
		ນ5ຮ
		ນ5ໜ
		ນ5ໝ
		ບ5ກ
		ບ5ກຣ
		ບ5ກລ
		ບ5ກວ
		ບ5ກຼ
		ບ5ຂ
		ບ5ຂຣ
		ບ5ຂລ
		ບ5ຂວ
		ບ5ຂຼ
		ບ5ຄ
		ບ5ຄຣ
		ບ5ຄລ
		ບ5ຄວ
		ບ5ຄຼ
		ບ5ງ
		ບ5ຈ
		ບ5ຊ
		ບ5ຍ
		ບ5ດ
		ບ5ດຣ
		ບ5ຕ
		ບ5ຕຣ
		ບ5ຖ
		ບ5ທ
		ບ5ນ
		ບ5ບ
		ບ5ບຣ
		ບ5ບລ
		ບ5ບຼ
		ບ5ປ
		ບ5ປຣ
		ບ5ປລ
		ບ5ປຼ
		ບ5ຜ
		ບ5ຝ
		ບ5ຝຣ
		ບ5ຝຼ
		ບ5ພ
		ບ5ຟ
		ບ5ມ
		ບ5ຢ
		ບ5ຣ
		ບ5ລ
		ບ5ວ
		ບ5ສ
		ບ5ສຣ
		ບ5ສລ
		ບ5ສວ
		ບ5ສຼ
		ບ5ຫ
		ບ5ຫງ
		ບ5ຫນ
		ບ5ຫຍ
		ບ5ຫມ
		ບ5ຫຣ
		ບ5ຫລ
		ບ5ຫວ
		ບ5ຫຼ
		ບ5ອ
		ບ5ຮ
		ບ5ໜ
		ບ5ໝ
		ວ5ກ
		ວ5ກຣ
		ວ5ກລ
		ວ5ກວ
		ວ5ກຼ
		ວ5ຂ
		ວ5ຂຣ
		ວ5ຂລ
		ວ5ຂວ
		ວ5ຂຼ
		ວ5ຄ
		ວ5ຄຣ
		ວ5ຄລ
		ວ5ຄວ
		ວ5ຄຼ
		ວ5ງ
		ວ5ຈ
		ວ5ຊ
		ວ5ຍ
		ວ5ດ
		ວ5ດຣ
		ວ5ຕ
		ວ5ຕຣ
		ວ5ຖ
		ວ5ທ
		ວ5ນ
		ວ5ບ
		ວ5ບຣ
		ວ5ບລ
		ວ5ບຼ
		ວ5ປ
		ວ5ປຣ
		ວ5ປລ
		ວ5ປຼ
		ວ5ຜ
		ວ5ຝ
		ວ5ຝຣ
		ວ5ຝຼ
		ວ5ພ
		ວ5ຟ
		ວ5ມ
		ວ5ຢ
		ວ5ຣ
		ວ5ລ
		ວ5ວ
		ວ5ສ
		ວ5ສຣ
		ວ5ສລ
		ວ5ສວ
		ວ5ສຼ
		ວ5ຫ
		ວ5ຫງ
		ວ5ຫນ
		ວ5ຫຍ
		ວ5ຫມ
		ວ5ຫຣ
		ວ5ຫລ
		ວ5ຫວ
		ວ5ຫຼ
		ວ5ອ
		ວ5ຮ
		ວ5ໜ
		ວ5ໝ
		ກ5ເ
		ງ5ເ
		ຍ5ເ
		ດ5ເ
		ມ5ເ
		ນ5ເ
		ບ5ເ
		ວ5ເ
		ກ5ແ
		ງ5ແ
		ຍ5ແ
		ດ5ແ
		ມ5ແ
		ນ5ແ
		ບ5ແ
		ວ5ແ
		ກ5ໂ
		ງ5ໂ
		ຍ5ໂ
		ດ5ໂ
		ມ5ໂ
		ນ5ໂ
		ບ5ໂ
		ວ5ໂ
		ກ5ໄ
		ງ5ໄ
		ຍ5ໄ
		ດ5ໄ
		ມ5ໄ
		ນ5ໄ
		ບ5ໄ
		ວ5ໄ
		ກ5ໃ
		ງ5ໃ
		ຍ5ໃ
		ດ5ໃ
		ມ5ໃ
		ນ5ໃ
		ບ5ໃ
		ວ5ໃ
		າ1ເ
		າ1ແ
		າ1ໂ
		າ1ໄ
		າ1ໃ
		ກ4່
		ກຣ4່
		ກລ4່
		ກວ4່
		ຂ4່
		ຂຣ4່
		ຂລ4່
		ຂວ4່
		ຄ4່
		ຄຣ4່
		ຄລ4່
		ຄວ4່
		ງ4່
		ຈ4່
		ຊ4່
		ຍ4່
		ດ4່
		ດຣ4່
		ຕ4່
		ຕຣ4່
		ຖ4່
		ທ4່
		ນ4່
		ບ4່
		ບຣ4່
		ບລ4່
		ປ4່
		ປຣ4່
		ປລ4່
		ຜ4່
		ຝ4່
		ຝຣ4່
		ພ4່
		ຟ4່
		ມ4່
		ຢ4່
		ຣ4່
		ລ4່
		ວ4່
		ສ4່
		ສຣ4່
		ສລ4່
		ສວ4່
		ຫ4່
		ຫງ4່
		ຫນ4່
		ຫຍ4່
		ຫມ4່
		ຫຣ4່
		ຫລ4່
		ຫວ4່
		ອ4່
		ຮ4່
		ໜ4່
		ໝ4່
		ຶ4່
		ື4່
		ິ4່
		ີ4່
		ກ4້
		ກຣ4້
		ກລ4້
		ກວ4້
		ຂ4້
		ຂຣ4້
		ຂລ4້
		ຂວ4້
		ຄ4້
		ຄຣ4້
		ຄລ4້
		ຄວ4້
		ງ4້
		ຈ4້
		ຊ4້
		ຍ4້
		ດ4້
		ດຣ4້
		ຕ4້
		ຕຣ4້
		ຖ4້
		ທ4້
		ນ4້
		ບ4້
		ບຣ4້
		ບລ4້
		ປ4້
		ປຣ4້
		ປລ4້
		ຜ4້
		ຝ4້
		ຝຣ4້
		ພ4້
		ຟ4້
		ມ4້
		ຢ4້
		ຣ4້
		ລ4້
		ວ4້
		ສ4້
		ສຣ4້
		ສລ4້
		ສວ4້
		ຫ4້
		ຫງ4້
		ຫນ4້
		ຫຍ4້
		ຫມ4້
		ຫຣ4້
		ຫລ4້
		ຫວ4້
		ອ4້
		ຮ4້
		ໜ4້
		ໝ4້
		ຶ4້
		ື4້
		ິ4້
		ີ4້
		ກ4໊
		ກຣ4໊
		ກລ4໊
		ກວ4໊
		ຂ4໊
		ຂຣ4໊
		ຂລ4໊
		ຂວ4໊
		ຄ4໊
		ຄຣ4໊
		ຄລ4໊
		ຄວ4໊
		ງ4໊
		ຈ4໊
		ຊ4໊
		ຍ4໊
		ດ4໊
		ດຣ4໊
		ຕ4໊
		ຕຣ4໊
		ຖ4໊
		ທ4໊
		ນ4໊
		ບ4໊
		ບຣ4໊
		ບລ4໊
		ປ4໊
		ປຣ4໊
		ປລ4໊
		ຜ4໊
		ຝ4໊
		ຝຣ4໊
		ພ4໊
		ຟ4໊
		ມ4໊
		ຢ4໊
		ຣ4໊
		ລ4໊
		ວ4໊
		ສ4໊
		ສຣ4໊
		ສລ4໊
		ສວ4໊
		ຫ4໊
		ຫງ4໊
		ຫນ4໊
		ຫຍ4໊
		ຫມ4໊
		ຫຣ4໊
		ຫລ4໊
		ຫວ4໊
		ອ4໊
		ຮ4໊
		ໜ4໊
		ໝ4໊
		ຶ4໊
		ື4໊
		ິ4໊
		ີ4໊
		ກ4໋໋
		ກຣ4໋໋
		ກລ4໋໋
		ກວ4໋໋
		ຂ4໋໋
		ຂຣ4໋໋
		ຂລ4໋໋
		ຂວ4໋໋
		ຄ4໋໋
		ຄຣ4໋໋
		ຄລ4໋໋
		ຄວ4໋໋
		ງ4໋໋
		ຈ4໋໋
		ຊ4໋໋
		ຍ4໋໋
		ດ4໋໋
		ດຣ4໋໋
		ຕ4໋໋
		ຕຣ4໋໋
		ຖ4໋໋
		ທ4໋໋
		ນ4໋໋
		ບ4໋໋
		ບຣ4໋໋
		ບລ4໋໋
		ປ4໋໋
		ປຣ4໋໋
		ປລ4໋໋
		ຜ4໋໋
		ຝ4໋໋
		ຝຣ4໋໋
		ພ4໋໋
		ຟ4໋໋
		ມ4໋໋
		ຢ4໋໋
		ຣ4໋໋
		ລ4໋໋
		ວ4໋໋
		ສ4໋໋
		ສຣ4໋໋
		ສລ4໋໋
		ສວ4໋໋
		ຫ4໋໋
		ຫງ4໋໋
		ຫນ4໋໋
		ຫຍ4໋໋
		ຫມ4໋໋
		ຫຣ4໋໋
		ຫລ4໋໋
		ຫວ4໋໋
		ອ4໋໋
		ຮ4໋໋
		ໜ4໋໋
		ໝ4໋໋
		ຶ4໋໋
		ື4໋໋
		ິ4໋໋
		ີ4໋໋
		ຸ4່
		ູ4່
		ັ4່
		ົ4່
		ຸ4້
		ູ4້
		ັ4້
		ົ4້
		ຸ4໊
		ູ4໊
		ັ4໊
		ົ4໊
		ຶ4໋
		ື4໋
		ິ4໋
		ີ4໋
		ຸ4໋
		ູ4໋
		ັ4໋
		ົ4໋
		ກ4ັ
		ກຣ4ັ
		ກລ4ັ
		ກວ4ັ
		ຂ4ັ
		ຂຣ4ັ
		ຂລ4ັ
		ຂວ4ັ
		ຄ4ັ
		ຄຣ4ັ
		ຄລ4ັ
		ຄວ4ັ
		ງ4ັ
		ຈ4ັ
		ຊ4ັ
		ຍ4ັ
		ດ4ັ
		ດຣ4ັ
		ຕ4ັ
		ຕຣ4ັ
		ຖ4ັ
		ທ4ັ
		ນ4ັ
		ບ4ັ
		ບຣ4ັ
		ບລ4ັ
		ປ4ັ
		ປຣ4ັ
		ປລ4ັ
		ຜ4ັ
		ຝ4ັ
		ຝຣ4ັ
		ພ4ັ
		ຟ4ັ
		ມ4ັ
		ຢ4ັ
		ຣ4ັ
		ລ4ັ
		ວ4ັ
		ສ4ັ
		ສຣ4ັ
		ສລ4ັ
		ສວ4ັ
		ຫ4ັ
		ຫງ4ັ
		ຫນ4ັ
		ຫຍ4ັ
		ຫມ4ັ
		ຫຣ4ັ
		ຫລ4ັ
		ຫວ4ັ
		ອ4ັ
		ຮ4ັ
		ໜ4ັ
		ໝ4ັ
		ກ4ົ
		ກຣ4ົ
		ກລ4ົ
		ກວ4ົ
		ຂ4ົ
		ຂຣ4ົ
		ຂລ4ົ
		ຂວ4ົ
		ຄ4ົ
		ຄຣ4ົ
		ຄລ4ົ
		ຄວ4ົ
		ງ4ົ
		ຈ4ົ
		ຊ4ົ
		ຍ4ົ
		ດ4ົ
		ດຣ4ົ
		ຕ4ົ
		ຕຣ4ົ
		ຖ4ົ
		ທ4ົ
		ນ4ົ
		ບ4ົ
		ບຣ4ົ
		ບລ4ົ
		ປ4ົ
		ປຣ4ົ
		ປລ4ົ
		ຜ4ົ
		ຝ4ົ
		ຝຣ4ົ
		ພ4ົ
		ຟ4ົ
		ມ4ົ
		ຢ4ົ
		ຣ4ົ
		ລ4ົ
		ວ4ົ
		ສ4ົ
		ສຣ4ົ
		ສລ4ົ
		ສວ4ົ
		ຫ4ົ
		ຫງ4ົ
		ຫນ4ົ
		ຫຍ4ົ
		ຫມ4ົ
		ຫຣ4ົ
		ຫລ4ົ
		ຫວ4ົ
		ອ4ົ
		ຮ4ົ
		ໜ4ົ
		ໝ4ົ
		ັ4ກ
		ັ4ງ
		ັ4ຍ
		ັ4ດ
		ັ4ມ
		ັ4ນ
		ັ4ບ
		ັ4ວ
		ົ4ກ
		ົ4ງ
		ົ4ຍ
		ົ4ດ
		ົ4ມ
		ົ4ນ
		ົ4ບ
		ົ4ວ
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
